test/src/morphology/V-puhksama64_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `puhksama: # Verb (64) `puhksama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `puhksama+V+Inf/mA: `puhksama
     `puhksama+V+Inf: puhastaq
     `puhksama+V+ActPrtPrc: puhasnuq
     `puhksama+V+PssPrtPrc: puhast
     `puhksama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: `puhksa
     `puhksama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: `puhksas
     `puhksama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `puhksi
     `puhksama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: puhaú
